Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-1305
Discharge of medical debt; contributions; how treated.

(1) The amount of interest and principal balance of medical debt discharged under the program shall not be considered income for income tax purposes as provided in section 77-2716.

(2) Contributions to the Medical Debt Relief Fund made by any private individual or private entity shall be tax deductible for income tax purposes as provided in section 77-2716.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 47.